nb: Aldersgruppe for katter: Voksen; Kattunge; Senior; Annet
th: กลุ่มอายุแมว: ผู้ใหญ่; ลูกแมว; สูงวัย; อื่นๆ
da: Kattealdersgruppe: Adult; Killing; Senior; Andet
sl-SI: Starostna skupina mačke: Odrasla; Mucka; Starejša; Drugo
en: Cat age group: Adult; Kitten; Senior; Other
nl: Leeftijdsgroep kat: Volwassen; Kitten; Senior; Andere
pt-PT: Grupo etário dos gatos: Adulto; Bebé; Sénior; Outro
de: Katzenaltersgruppe: Erwachsen; Kitten; Senior; Sonstiges
vi: Nhóm tuổi mèo: Trưởng thành; Mèo con; Phù hợp với người cao tuổi; Khác
pt-BR: Faixa etária do gato: Adulto; Filhote; Idoso; Outro
fi: Kissan ikäryhmä: Aikuinen; Kissanpentu; Seniori; Muu
el: Ηλικιακή ομάδα γάτας: Ενήλικη; Γατάκι; Ηλικιωμένη; Άλλο
ro-RO: Grup de vârstă pisici: Adult; Pisoi; Senior; Altele
fr: Tranche d’âge du chat: Adulte; Kitten; Senior; Autre
cs: Věková skupina koček: Dospělý; Kotě; Senior; Jiné
hu: Macska életszakasza: Felnőtt; Fiatal macska; Idős macska; Egyéb
ko: 고양이 연령대: 어덜트; 키튼; 시니어; 기타
zh-TW: 貓咪年齡層: 成人; 幼貓; 高齡; 其他
es: Grupo de edad del gato: Adulto; Gatito; Sénior; Otros
hr-HR: Dobna skupina mačaka: Odrasle mačke; Mačići; Starije mačke; Ostalo
sv: Åldersgrupp för katt: Vuxen; Kattunge; Senior; Övrigt
tr: Kedi Yaş Grubu: Yetişkin; Kedi yavrusu; Yaşlı; Diğer
sk-SK: Veková skupina mačiek: Dospelý; Mačiatko; Senior; Iné
bg-BG: Възрастова група на котки: Зряла възраст; Котенца; Възрастни; Други
it: Fascia di età del gatto: Adulto; Gattino; Senior; Altro
pl: Grupa wiekowa kotów: Dorosły; Kociątko; wyższy; Inne
ja: 猫の年齢層: 成犬; 子猫; シニア; その他
lt-LT: Kačių amžiaus grupė: Suaugusiems; Kačiukas; Senjorams; Kita
zh-CN: 猫咪年龄段: 成年; 幼猫; 老年; 其他
ru: Возрастная группа кошек: Взрослый; Котенок; Пожилой; Другое